District of Columbia statutes.
47-2849

Refund of erroneously-paid fees.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to refund any license fee or tax, or portion thereof, erroneously paid or collected under this chapter.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 628, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 51
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 563, ch. 366
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 43(j), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.
Real property tax sales, refunds, see §§ 47-1317 to 47-1319.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 1-321.02.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 47-2849.
1973 Ed., § 47-2350.

Prior Codifications